Utah statutes.
17B-1-311.   Board member prohibited from district employment -- Exception.

(1)  No elected or appointed member of the board of trustees of a local district may, while serving on the board, be employed by the district, whether as an employee or under a contract.

(2)  No person employed by a local district, whether as an employee or under a contract, may serve on the board of that local district.

(3)  A local district is not in violation of a prohibition described in Subsection (1) or (2) if the local district:

(a)  treats a member of a board of trustees as an employee for income tax purposes; and

(b)  complies with the compensation limits of Section 17B-1-307 for purposes of that member.

(4)  This section does not apply to a local district if:

(a)  fewer than 3,000 people live within 40 miles of the primary place of employment, measured over all weather public roads; and

(b)  with respect to the employment of a board of trustees member under Subsection (1):

(i)  the job opening has had reasonable public notice; and

(ii)  the person employed is the best qualified candidate for the position.



Amended by Chapter 448, 2013 General Session

